Louisiana, session 2026, SB482.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2925(A)(1), (3), (6), and (7) and the introductory paragraph of
2926(A) and (B)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:2926(D), (E), and (F) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2925. Individual graduation plans
A.(1) By the end of the eighth grade, every student, with the assistance of his
parent or legal guardian, and school counselor, or career coach, and for a student
with an exceptionality as defined in R.S. 17:1942, except a student identified as
gifted or talented and who has no other exceptionality, the student's Individualized
Education Program team, if applicable, shall begin to develop an Individual
Graduation Plan to guide the next academic year's course work and to assist the
student in exploring educational and career possibilities and in making appropriate
secondary and postsecondary education decisions as part of an overall postsecondary
plan.
* * *
(3) By the end of the tenth grade, each student's Individual Graduation Plan,
based on the student's academic record, talents, and interests, shall outline high
school graduation requirements relevant to the student's chosen postsecondary goals.
Each student, with the assistance of his parent or legal guardian, and school
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 482 ENROLLED
counselor, or career coach, shall choose the high school curriculum framework and
related graduation requirements that best meet his postsecondary goals. Each
student's Individual Graduation Plan or the student's Individualized Education
Program, if applicable, shall include the recommended sequence of courses for
successful completion of a standard diploma.
* * *
(6) Upon completion of the review, the plan shall be signed by the student,
his parent or legal guardian, and the school counselor, or the career coach.
(7) Prior to revising a student's Individual Graduation Plan, the school
counselor or career coach shall meet with the student's parent or legal guardian
either in person or virtually to explain the possible impacts the revisions to the plan
might have on the student's graduation requirements and postsecondary education
goals. Any revisions to a student's plan shall be approved in writing by the student's
parent or legal guardian.
* * *
§2926. Student counseling; training and professional
A. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall develop an
advisement policy for the middle and high school grades that local school districts
can may use to equip school counselors or career coaches with the skills and
information needed to:
* * *
B.(1) The state Department of Education shall provide professional
development and in-service training opportunities to school counselors or career
coaches regarding development of individual graduation plans.
* * *
D. Each city, parish, or other local public school board may provide for
the individualized student planning and career coaching required by this
Section through the use of school counselors or career coaches.
(1) No later than January 1, 2027, the state Department of Education
shall publish on its website a list of high-quality career coaching vendors from
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 482 ENROLLED
which schools may select.
(2) Each city, parish, or other local public school board may form
regional consortia to share the costs of contracting with career coaches.
E. Each city, parish, or other local public school board shall include a
description of its plan to provide career coaching to each student as part of the
pupil progression plan developed pursuant to R.S. 17:24.4.
F. The state Department of Education shall annually publish on its
website a list of each city, parish, or other local public school board that have
not spent more than ninety-five percent of the career development fund dollars
appropriated for the previous fiscal year.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.